Tennessee, session 114, SB0707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1504(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting the following:
(d) Prior to making a sale of, or distributing, tobacco, smoking hemp, vapor
product, or smokeless nicotine product, a person engaged in the sale or distribution of
tobacco, smoking hemp, vapor product, or smokeless nicotine product shall demand
from the prospective purchaser or recipient, and the prospective purchaser or recipient
must present to the seller or distributor, proof of age, if an ordinary person would
conclude on the basis of appearance that the prospective purchaser or recipient may be
less than fifty (50) years of age. In the case of distribution by mail, the distributor of
tobacco, smoking hemp, vapor product, or smokeless nicotine product shall obtain from
the addressee an affirmative statement that the person is twenty-one (21) years of age
or older, and shall inform the recipient that the person is strictly prohibited from
distributing any tobacco, smoking hemp, vapor product, or smokeless nicotine product,
as defined by this part, to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1507(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting the following:
(b) In any place where supervision of a vending machine, or operation by token
is required by this section, the person responsible for that supervision or the sale of the
token shall demand from the prospective purchaser, and the prospective purchaser must
SB0707
002484
- 1 -

present to the person responsible for that supervision or sale, proof of age, if an ordinary
person would conclude on the basis of appearance that the prospective purchaser may
be under fifty (50) years of age.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1509(e)(1), is amended by
deleting "twenty-nine (29) years of age" and substituting "forty-nine (49) years of age".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002484